test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - báttásj: # OAPPÁSJ
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Nom: báttásj
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Gen: báttátja
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: báttátjimme
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Acc: báttátjav
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ine: báttátjin
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ill: báttátjij
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Ela: báttátjis
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Sg+Com: báttátjijn
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Nom: báttátja
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Gen: báttátjij
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Acc: báttátjijt
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ine: báttátjijn
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ill: báttátjijda
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: báttátjijdasihtte
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Ela: báttátjijs
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Pl+Com: báttátjij
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Ess: báttátjin
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: báttátjasj
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    báttásj+N+Gram/Dimin+Abe: []
    
  Noun - allel: # BADJEL
    allel+N+Sg+Nom: allel
    allel+N+Sg+Gen: allela
    allel+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: []
    allel+N+Sg+Acc: allelav
    allel+N+Sg+Ine: allelin
    allel+N+Sg+Ill: allelij
    allel+N+Sg+Ela: allelis
    allel+N+Sg+Com: []
    allel+N+Pl+Nom: []
    allel+N+Pl+Gen: []
    allel+N+Pl+Acc: []
    allel+N+Pl+Ine: []
    allel+N+Pl+Ill: []
    allel+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: []
    allel+N+Pl+Ela: []
    allel+N+Pl+Com: []
    allel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: allelasj
    allel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: allelattjav
    allel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: allelattjasj
    allel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: allelahtes #should have this form?
    allel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: allelahtes #should have this form?
    allel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: allelahttásit
    allel+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    allel+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    allel+N+Abe: []
    allel+N+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [allelap, allelup]
    allel+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: allelabbuj
    allel+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: allelabmusa
    allel+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: allelappusj
    allel+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Ine: allelapputjin
    allel+N+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: allelabmusit
    
  Noun - Sjievnnjet: # SJIEVNNJET
    sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjet
    sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Gen: sjievnnjeda
    sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Ill: sjievnnjedij
    sjievnnjet+N+Pl+Ine: sjievnnjedijn
    sjievnnjet+N+Pl+Com: sjievnnjedij
    sjievnnjet+N+Pl+Ill: sjievnnjedijda
    sjievnnjet+N+Ess: sjievnnjedin
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjedasj
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sjievnnjet+N+Abe: [sjievnnjedahtá, sjievnnjedahti]
    sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: sjievnnjedis
    sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: sjievnnjedasema
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjedabbo
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjedamos
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: sjievnnjedabmusij
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sjievnnjedabmusit
    sjievnnjet+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjedappusj

  Noun - sjævnjásj: # SJIEVNNJET
    sjævnjásj+N+Sg+Nom: [sjævnjásj, sjävnjásj] 
    sjævnjásj+N+Sg+Gen: [sjævnjátja, sjävnjátja]
    sjævnjásj+N+Sg+Ill: [sjævnjátjij, sjävnjátjij] 
    sjævnjásj+N+Pl+Ill: [sjævnjátjijda, sjävnjátjijda]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sjævnjátjasj, sjävnjátjasj]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [sjävnjátjahtes, sjævnjátjahtes]
    sjævnjásj+N+Abe: [sjævnjátjahtá, sjævnjátjahti, sjävnjátjahti, sjävnjátjahtá]
    sjævnjásj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [sjævnjátjis, sjävnjátjis] 
    sjævnjásj+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [sjævnjátjasema, sjävnjátjasema] 
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sjävnjátjabbo, sjævnjátjabbo] 
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnjátjappot, sjävnjátjappot]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnjátjamos, sjävnjátjamos]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: [sjævnjátjabmusij, sjävnjátjabmusij]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnjátjabmusit, sjävnjátjabmusit]
    sjævnjásj+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnjátjappusj, sjävnjátjappusj]
